New Jersey, session 222, S2178.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop and maintain a list of industry-valued credentials identifying the specific credentials offered in this State in which employers are most interested, based on analysis of State labor market data and feedback from employers in the State.  The industry-valued credential list shall be updated annually and made available as a list and as a downloadable document on the Internet website of the department. b.    The department shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after enactment except that the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.